California statutes. Public Contract Code
This definition of “maintenance” expressly includes, but is not limited to: carpentry, electrical, plumbing, glazing, and other craftwork designed consistent with the definition set forth above to preserve the facility in a safe, efficient, and continually usable condition for which it was intended, including repairs, cleaning, and other operations on machinery and other equipment permanently attached to the building or realty as fixtures.

This definition does not include, among other types of work, janitorial or custodial services and protection of the sort provided by guards or other security forces.

It is the intent of the Legislature that this definition does not include painting, repainting, or decorating other than touchup, but instead it is the intent of the Legislature that such activities be controlled directly by the provisions of Section 20114.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20116.

It shall be unlawful to split or separate into smaller work orders or projects any work, project, service, or purchase for the purpose of evading the provisions of this article requiring contracting after competitive bidding.

The district shall maintain job orders or similar records indicating the total cost expended on each project in accordance with the procedures established in the most recent edition of the California School Accounting Manual for a period of not less than three years after completion of the project.

Informal bidding may be used on work, projects, services, or purchases that cost up to the limits set forth in this article. For the purpose of securing informal bids, the board shall publish annually in a newspaper of general circulation published in the district, or if there is no such newspaper, then in some newspaper in general circulation in the county, a notice inviting contractors to register to be notified of future informal bidding projects. All contractors included on the informal bidding list shall be given notice of all informal bid projects in any manner as the district deems appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 897, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

20117.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in the event there are two or more identical lowest or highest bids, as the case may be, submitted to a school district for the purchase, sale, or lease of real property, supplies, materials, equipment, services, bonds, or the awarding of any contract, pursuant to a provision requiring competitive bidding, the governing board of any school district may determine by lot which bid shall be accepted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 527.)
-------------------------------------------

20118.

Notwithstanding Sections 20111 and 20112, the governing board of any school district, without advertising for bids, if the board has determined it to be in the best interests of the district, may authorize by contract, lease, requisition, or purchase order, any public corporation or agency, including any county, city, town, or district, to lease data-processing equipment, purchase materials, supplies, equipment, automotive vehicles, tractors, and other personal property for the district in the manner in which the public corporation or agency is authorized by law to make the leases or purchases from a vendor. Upon receipt of the personal property, if the property complies with the specifications set forth in the contract, lease, requisition, or purchase order, the school district may draw a warrant in favor of the public corporation or agency for the amount of the approved invoice, including the reasonable costs to the public corporation or agency for furnishing the services incidental to the lease or purchase of the personal property, or the school district may make payment directly to the vendor. Alternatively, if there is an existing contract between a public corporation or agency and a vendor for the lease or purchase of the personal property, a school district may authorize the lease or purchase of personal property directly from the vendor by contract, lease, requisition, or purchase order and make payment to the vendor under the same terms that are available to the public corporation or agency under the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 730, Sec. 19.75.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

20118.1.

The governing board of any school district may contract with an acceptable party who is one of the three lowest responsible bidders for the procurement or maintenance, or both, of electronic data-processing systems and supporting software in any manner the board deems appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 529.)
-------------------------------------------

20118.2.

(a) Due to the highly specialized and unique nature of technology, telecommunications, related equipment, software, and services, because products and materials of that nature are undergoing rapid technological changes, and in order to allow for the introduction of new technological changes into the operations of the school district, it is in the public’s best interest to allow a school district to consider, in addition to price, factors such as vendor financing, performance reliability, standardization, life-cycle costs, delivery timetables, support logistics, the broadest possible range of competing products and materials available, fitness of purchase, manufacturer’s warranties, and similar factors in the award of contracts for technology, telecommunications, related equipment, software, and services.

(b) This section applies only to a school district’s procurement of computers, software, telecommunications equipment, microwave equipment, and other related electronic equipment and apparatus. This section does not apply to contracts for construction or for the procurement of any product that is available in substantial quantities to the general public.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 20118.1, a school district may, after a finding is made by the governing board that a particular procurement qualifies under subdivision (b), authorize the procurement of the product through competitive negotiation as described in subdivision (d).

(d) For purposes of this section, competitive negotiation includes, but is not limited to, all of the following requirements:

(1) A request for proposals shall be prepared and submitted to an adequate number of qualified sources, as determined by the school district, to permit reasonable competition consistent with the nature and requirement of the procurement.

(2) Notice of the request for proposals shall be published at least twice in a newspaper of general circulation, at least 10 days before the date for receipt of the proposals.

(3) The school district shall make every effort to generate the maximum feasible number of proposals from qualified sources and shall make a finding to that effect before proceeding to negotiate if only a single response to the request for proposals is received.

(4) The request for proposals shall identify all significant evaluation factors, including price, and their relative importance.

(5) The school district shall provide reasonable procedures for the technical evaluation of the proposals received, the identification of qualified sources, and the selection for the award of the contract.

(6) Award shall be made to the qualified bidder whose proposal meets the evaluation standards and will be most advantageous to the school district with price and all other factors considered.

(7) If award is not made to the bidder whose proposal contains the lowest price, the school district shall make a finding setting forth the basis for the award.

(e) The school district, at its discretion, may reject all proposals and request new proposals.

(f) Provisions in any contract concerning utilization of small business enterprises, that are in accordance with the request for proposals, shall not be subject to negotiation with the successful proposer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 509, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

20118.3.

The governing board of any school district may purchase supplementary textbooks, library books, educational films, audiovisual materials, test materials, workbooks, instructional computer software packages, or periodicals in any amount needed for the operation of the schools of the district without taking estimates or advertising for bids.

This section shall become operative January 1, 1989, and is declaratory of existing law and practice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

20118.4.

(a) If any change or alteration of a contract governed by Article 3 (commencing with Section 17595) of Chapter 5 of Part 10.5 of the Education Code is ordered by the governing board of the district, the change or alteration shall be specified in writing and the cost agreed upon between the governing board and the contractor. The board may authorize the contractor to proceed with performance of the change or alteration, without the formality of securing bids, if the cost so agreed upon does not exceed the greater of the following:

(1) The amount specified in Section 20111 or 20114, whichever is applicable to the original contract.

(2) Ten percent of the original contract price.

(b) The governing board of any school district, or of two or more school districts governed by governing boards of identical personnel, having an average daily attendance of 400,000 or more as shown by the annual report of the county superintendent of schools for the preceding year, may also authorize any change or alteration of a contract for reconstruction or rehabilitation work, other than for the construction of new buildings or other new structures, if the cost of the change or alteration is in excess of the limitations in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) but does not exceed 25 percent of the original contract price, without the formality of securing bids, and the change or alteration is a necessary and integral part of the work under the contract and the taking of bids would delay the completion of the contract. Changes exceeding 15 percent of the original contract price shall be approved by an affirmative vote of not less than 75 percent of the members of the governing board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 540.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.1. Task Order Contracting for School Districts [20118.5. - 20118.9.]

20118.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to enable school districts to use cost-effective options for renovating and repairing school facilities and grounds.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide an optional alternative procedure for bidding on these projects. It is the intent of the Legislature that the task order procurement method improve contract efficiencies and reduce the general fund impact to school districts by reducing contract delays producing a savings in both contract costs and administration.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that task order contracts be competitively bid for
 and awarded to the bidders providing the most qualified responsive bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 129, Sec. 1.   (AB 2488)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 20118.9.)
-------------------------------------------

20118.6.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the governing board of a school district may award multiple task order procurement contracts for the repair and renovation of school buildings and grounds, each not exceeding three million dollars ($3,000,000) through a single request for bid. For purposes of this article, task order procurement contracts may include, but are not limited to, services, repairs, including maintenance, and construction, as authorized in Section 20111, paid for with moneys from the school district’s general fund, a local school construction bond, or federal or state funds. The scope of a contract awarded pursuant to this article shall be limited to the purposes authorized by its funding source. The contracts shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder, and shall be based primarily on
 plans and specifications for typical work.

(b) For purposes of this section, “school district” means the Los Angeles Unified School District.

(c) Before entering into a contract under this section, a school district shall ensure that it is in compliance with Section 45103.1 of the Education Code.

(d) (1) A task order procurement
 contract shall only be awarded to supplement existing personnel and shall not be used to supplant existing personnel.

(2) A task order procurement contract authorized by this article shall not include services currently or customarily performed by represented employees who are in the school district’s Collective Bargaining Unit B, C, D, G, F, or S.

(e) A school district may utilize task order procurement contracting pursuant to this article only if the school district has entered into a project labor agreement or agreements that meet the requirements of Section 2500 for all its public works projects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 523, Sec. 1.   (AB 439)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 20118.9.)
-------------------------------------------

20118.7.

(a) (1) On or before January 15, 2029, and on or before January 15, 2033, a school district that uses the task order procurement contracting method pursuant to this article shall submit to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature a report on the use of the task order procurement contracting method. The report shall be prepared by an independent third party and the school district shall pay for the cost of the report.

(2) The report shall include, but is not limited to, the following information:

(A) A description of the projects awarded using the task order procurement contracting method.

(B) The contract award amounts.

(C) The task order contractors awarded the projects.

(D) A description of any written protests concerning any aspect of the solicitation, bid, or award of the task order procurement contracts, including the resolution of the protests.

(E) A description of the prequalification process.

(F) If a project awarded under this article has been completed, an assessment of the performance on a per project basis, including, but not limited to, a summary of any delays or cost increases. The report may also include an assessment of the performance on a per contractor basis.

(b) (1) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code,
 this section is inoperative on January 1, 2034.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 523, Sec. 2.   (AB 439)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Inoperative January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 20118.9.)
-------------------------------------------

20118.8.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, the task order procurement contracting method is not intended to change any guideline, criterion, procedure, or requirement of the governing board of the school district to let a contract for a project to the lowest responsible bidder or else reject all bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 129, Sec. 1.   (AB 2488)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 20118.9.)
-------------------------------------------

20118.9.

This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2034, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 523, Sec. 3.   (AB 439)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.    Note: Repeal affects Article 3.1, commencing with Section 20118.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.3. Los Angeles Unified School District — Best Value Procurement [20119. - 20119.5.]

20119.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to enable school districts to use cost-effective options for building and modernizing school facilities. The Legislature has recognized the merits of the best value procurement method process in the past by authorizing its use for projects undertaken by the University of California.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that school districts using the best value procurement method require a clear understanding of the roles and responsibilities
 of each participant in the best value process. As reflected in the University of California report to the Legislature, the benefits of a best value procurement method include a reduction in contract delays, change orders, and claims producing a savings in both contract costs and administration.

(c) The Legislature further finds and declares that the best value procurement method has provided the benefits of more qualified contractors applying and an open dialogue on project approach, according to the Los Angeles Unified School District’s interim report to the Legislature from November 2019, titled “Los Angeles Unified School District, Final Report on Best Value Procurement Method.”

(d) The Legislature also finds and declares that the Los Angeles Unified School District
 achieved expected benefits from the best
 value method such as fewer change orders, less schedule delays, and fewer claims according to the Los Angeles Unified School District’s final report to the Legislature from December 2024, titled “Los Angeles Unified School District, Review of the Best Value Procurement Method.” 

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide to all school districts an optional, alternative procedure for bidding and building school construction projects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 144, Sec. 1.   (AB 361)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

20119.1.

As used in this article:

(a) “Best value” means a procurement process whereby the selected bidder may be selected on the basis of objective criteria for evaluating the qualifications of bidders with the resulting selection representing the best combination of price and qualifications.

(b) “Best value contract” means a competitively bid contract entered into pursuant to this article.

(c) “Best value contractor” means a properly licensed person, firm, or corporation that submits a bid for and is awarded a best value contract.

(d) “Best value score” means the resulting score when the school
 district divides the bidder’s price by the bidder’s qualification score.

(e) “Demonstrated management competency” means the experience, competency, capability, and capacity of the proposed management staffing to complete projects of similar size, scope, or complexity.

(f) “Financial condition” means the financial resources needed to perform the contract. The criteria used to evaluate a bidder’s financial condition shall include, at a minimum, capacity to obtain all required payment bonds and required insurance.

(g) “Governing board” or “governing board of the school district” means the governing board of the Los Angeles Unified School District.

(h) “Labor
 compliance” means the ability to comply with, and past conformance with, contract and statutory requirements for the payment of wages and qualifications of the workforce. The criteria used to evaluate a bidder’s labor compliance shall include, at a minimum, the bidder’s ability to comply with the apprenticeship requirements of the California Apprenticeship Council and the Department of Industrial Relations, its past conformance with such requirements, and its past conformance with requirements to pay prevailing wages on public works projects.

(i) “Project” has the same meaning as “public project,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 22002.

(j) “Qualifications” means financial condition, relevant experience, demonstrated management competency, labor compliance, the
 safety record of the bidder, and, to the extent relevant, the preceding qualifications as they pertain to all subcontractors proposed to be used by the bidder for designated portions of the work.

(k) “Relevant experience” means the experience, competency, capability, and capacity to complete projects of similar size, scope, or complexity.

(l) “Safety record” shall be deemed “acceptable” if a contractor’s experience modification rate for the most recent three-year period is an average of 1.00 or less, and the contractor’s average total recordable injury or illness rate and average lost work rate for the most recent three-year period do not exceed the applicable statistical standards for its business category or if the bidder is a party to an alternative dispute resolution
 system as provided for in Section 3201.5 of the Labor Code.

(m) “School district” means the Los Angeles Unified School District.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 46, Sec. 2.   (AB 1981)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

20119.2.

(a) The governing board, for projects over one million dollars ($1,000,000), may use the best value procurement method in accordance with this article.

(b) The bidder may be selected on the basis of the best value to the governing board of the school district. In order to implement this method of selection, the governing board of the school district shall adopt and publish procedures and required guidelines for evaluating the qualifications of the bidders that ensure the best value selections by the school district are conducted in a fair and impartial manner. These procedures and guidelines shall conform to this article and shall be mandatory for the school district when using
 best value selection.

(c) If the governing board of the school district deems it to be for the best interest of the school district, the governing board of the school district, on the refusal or failure of the selected bidder for a project to execute a tendered contract, may award it to the bidder with the second lowest best value score. If the second bidder fails or refuses to execute the contract, the governing board of the school district may likewise award it to the bidder with the third lowest best value score.

(d) The governing board of the school district shall let any contract for a project pursuant to this article to the selected bidder that represents the best value or else reject all bids.

(e) (1) If the school district elects to award a project pursuant to this section, retention proceeds withheld by the district from the selected best value contractor shall not exceed 5 percent if a performance and payment bond, issued by an admitted surety insurer, is required in the solicitation of bids.

(2) In a contract between the selected best value contractor and a subcontractor, and in a contract between a subcontractor and any subcontractor thereunder, the percentage of the retention proceeds withheld shall not exceed the percentage specified in the contract between the district and the selected best value contractor. If the selected best value contractor provides written notice to a subcontractor that, prior to or at the time the bid is requested, a bond may be required and the subcontractor subsequently is unable or refuses
 to furnish a bond to the selected best value contractor, then the selected best value contractor may withhold retention proceeds in excess of the percentage specified in the contract between the district and the selected best value contractor from any payment made by the selected best value contractor to the subcontractor.

(f) All subcontractors bidding on contracts pursuant to this chapter shall be afforded the protection contained in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 144, Sec. 2.   (AB 361)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

20119.3.

The governing board of the school district shall proceed in accordance with the following when awarding best value contracts under this article:

(a) The school district shall prepare a solicitation for bids and give notice pursuant to Section 20112.

(b) (1) The school district shall establish a procedure to prequalify bidders as required by this code. Information submitted by the bidder as part of the evaluation process shall not be open to public inspection to the extent that information is exempt from disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the
 Government Code).

(2) A best value entity shall not be prequalified or short-listed unless the entity provides an enforceable commitment to the governing board that the entity and its subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the project or contract that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades, in accordance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1.

(3) Paragraph (2) shall not apply if any of the following requirements are met:

(A) The school district has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project or contract to use a skilled
 and trained workforce, and the entity agrees to be bound by that project labor agreement.

(B) The project or contract is being performed under the extension or renewal of a project labor agreement that was entered into by the school district prior to January 1, 2025.

(C) The entity has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind the entity and all its subcontractors at every tier performing the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500.

(c) Each solicitation for bids shall do all of the
 following:

(1) Invite prequalified bidders to submit sealed bids in the manner prescribed by this article.

(2) Include a section identifying and describing the following:

(A) Criteria that the school district will consider in evaluating the qualifications of the bidders.

(B) The methodology and rating or weighting system that will be used by the school district in evaluating bids.

(C) The relative importance or weight assigned to the criteria for evaluating the qualifications of bidders identified in the request for bids.

(d) Final
 evaluation of the bidders shall be done in a manner that prevents the identity of the bidders and the cost or price information from being revealed in evaluating the qualifications of the bidders prior to completion of qualification scoring.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 144, Sec. 3.   (AB 361)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

20119.4.

Selection of the best value contractor shall be made as follows:

(a) (1) The school district shall evaluate the qualifications of the bidders based solely upon the criteria set forth in the solicitation documents, and shall assign a qualification score to each bid.

(2) Qualification scores shall be determined by using only the criteria and selection procedures specifically identified in the request for proposals. The following minimum factors, however, shall be weighted as deemed appropriate by the school district:

(A) Relevant experience.

(B) Safety record.

(C) Other factors identified in the request for proposal.

(b) To determine the best value contractor, the school district shall divide each bidder’s price by its qualifications score. A preference of up to 5 percent shall be applied to the price of a bid submitted by a small business, as defined by the school district, before dividing the bidder’s price by its qualification score. The lowest resulting cost per quality point will represent the best value bid. The award of the contract shall be made to the bidder whose bid is determined, by the school district in writing, to be the best value to the school district.

(c) The school district
 shall issue a written decision of its contract award or else reject all bids.

(d) Upon issuance of a contract award, the school district shall publicly announce its award identifying the project, the project price, the best value contractor to which the award is made, as well as the prices, qualification scores, and resulting costs per qualification point for all responsive bidders. The contract file shall include documentation sufficient to support the decision to award.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.   (AB 1185)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

20119.5.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, the best value procurement method is not intended to change any guideline, criterion, procedure, or requirement of the governing board of the school district to let a contract for a project to the lowest responsible bidder or else reject all bids.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 20119.6 by Stats. 2025, Ch. 144, Sec. 5.   (AB 361)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.4. Best Value Procurement for School Districts  [20119.8. - 20119.13.]

20119.8.

As used in this article: 

(a) “Best value” means a procurement process whereby the selected bidder may be selected on the basis of objective criteria for evaluating the qualifications of bidders with the resulting selection representing the best combination of price and qualifications. 

(b) “Best value contract” means a competitively bid contract entered into pursuant to this article. 

(c) “Best value contractor” means a properly licensed person, firm, or corporation that submits a bid for and is awarded a best value contract. 

(d) “Best value score” means the resulting score when the school district divides the bidder’s price by the bidder’s qualification score. 

(e) “Demonstrated management competency” means the experience, competency, capability, and capacity of the proposed management staffing to complete projects of similar size, scope, or complexity. 

(f) “Financial condition” means the financial resources needed to perform the contract. The criteria used to evaluate a bidder’s financial condition shall include, at a minimum, capacity to obtain all required payment bonds and required insurance. 

(g) (1) “Governing board” or “governing board of the school district” means the governing board of a school district.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), “school district” does not include the Los Angeles Unified School District.

(h) “Labor compliance” means the ability to comply with, and past conformance with, contract and statutory requirements for the payment of wages and qualifications of the workforce. The criteria used to evaluate a bidder’s labor compliance shall include, at a minimum, the bidder’s ability to comply with the apprenticeship requirements of the California Apprenticeship Council and the Department of Industrial Relations, its past conformance
 with such requirements, and its past conformance with requirements to pay prevailing wages on public works projects. 

(i) “Project” has the same meaning as “public project,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 22002. 

(j) “Qualifications” means financial condition, relevant experience,
 demonstrated management competency, labor compliance, the safety record of the bidder, and, to the extent relevant, the preceding qualifications as they pertain to all subcontractors proposed to be used by the bidder for designated portions of the work. 

(k) “Relevant experience” means the experience, competency, capability, and capacity to complete projects of similar size, scope, or complexity. 

(l) “Safety record” shall be deemed “acceptable” if a contractor’s experience modification rate for the most recent three-year period is an average of 1.00 or less, and the contractor’s average total recordable injury or illness rate and average lost work rate for the most recent three-year period do not exceed the applicable statistical standards for its business category or if the bidder is a party to an alternative dispute resolution system as provided for in Section 3201.5 of the Labor Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 144, Sec. 7.   (AB 361)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 20119.13.)
-------------------------------------------

20119.9.

(a) The governing board, for projects over one million dollars ($1,000,000), before December 31, 2030, may use the best value procurement method in accordance with this article. 

(b) The bidder may be selected on the basis of the best value to the governing board of the school district. In order to implement this method of selection, the governing board of the school district shall adopt and publish procedures and required guidelines for evaluating the qualifications of the bidders that ensure the best value selections by the school district are conducted in a fair and impartial manner. These procedures and guidelines shall conform to this article and shall be mandatory for the school district when using best value selection.

(c) If the governing board of the school district deems it to be for the best interest of the school
 district, the governing board of the school district, on the refusal or failure of the selected bidder for a project to execute a tendered contract, may award it to the bidder with the second lowest best value score. If the second bidder fails or refuses to execute the contract, the governing board of the school district may likewise award it to the bidder with the third lowest best value score. 

(d) The governing board of the school district
 shall let any contract for a project pursuant to this article to the selected bidder that represents the best value or else reject all bids. 

(e) (1) If the school district elects to award a project pursuant to this section, retention proceeds withheld by the school district from the selected best value contractor shall not exceed 5 percent if a performance and payment bond, issued by an admitted surety insurer, is required in the solicitation of bids.

(2) In a contract between the selected best value contractor and a subcontractor, and
 in a contract between a subcontractor and any subcontractor thereunder, the percentage of the retention proceeds withheld shall not exceed the percentage specified in the contract between the school district and the selected best value contractor. If the selected best value contractor provides written notice to a subcontractor that, prior to or at the time the bid is requested, a bond may be required and the subcontractor subsequently is unable or refuses to furnish a bond to the selected best value contractor, then the selected best value contractor may withhold retention proceeds in excess of the percentage specified in the contract between the school district and the selected best value
 contractor from any payment made by the selected best value contractor to the subcontractor.

(f) All subcontractors bidding on contracts pursuant to this chapter shall be afforded the protection contained in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 144, Sec. 7.   (AB 361)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 20119.13.)
-------------------------------------------

20119.10.

The governing board of the school district shall proceed in accordance with all of the following when awarding best value contracts under this article: 

(a) The school district shall prepare a solicitation for bids and give notice pursuant to Section 20112. 

(b) (1) The school district shall establish a procedure to prequalify bidders as required by this code. Information submitted by the bidder as part of the evaluation process shall not be open to public inspection to the extent that information is exempt from disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code). 

(2) A best value entity shall not be prequalified or short-listed unless the entity provides an enforceable commitment to the governing board of the school district that the entity and its subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the project or contract that falls within an apprenticeable
 occupation in the building and construction trades, in accordance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1. 

(3) Paragraph (2) shall not apply if any of the following requirements are met: 

(A) The school district has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce, and the entity agrees to be bound by that project labor agreement. 

(B) The project or contract is being performed under the extension or renewal of a project labor agreement that was entered into by the school
 district prior to January 1, 2025. 

(C) The entity has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind the entity and all its subcontractors at every tier performing the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce. 

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500. 

(c) Each solicitation for bids shall do all of the following: 

(1) Invite prequalified bidders to submit sealed bids in the manner prescribed by this article. 

(2) Include a section identifying and describing all of the following: 

(A) Criteria that the school district will consider in evaluating the qualifications of the bidders. 

(B) The methodology and rating or weighting system that will be used by the school district in evaluating bids. 

(C) The relative importance or weight assigned to the criteria for evaluating the qualifications of bidders identified in the request for bids.

(d) Final evaluation of the bidders shall be done in a manner that prevents the identity of the bidders and the cost or price information from being revealed in evaluating the qualifications of the bidders prior to completion of qualification scoring.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 144, Sec. 7.   (AB 361)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 20119.13.)
-------------------------------------------

20119.11.

(a) (1) (A) A school district that uses the best value procurement method pursuant to this article shall submit to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature a report on the use of the best value procurement method. 

(B) The report shall be prepared by an independent third party and the school district shall pay for the cost of the report. 

(C) Multiple school districts may work together to submit a single report reflecting each of the participating school districts.

(D) The report shall be submitted on or before January 1, 2030, to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature. 

(2) The report shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following information:

(A) A description of the projects awarded using the
 best value procedures. 

(B) The contract award amounts.

(C) The names of the best value contractors awarded the projects.

(D) A description of any written protests concerning any aspect of the solicitation, bid, or award of the best value contracts, including the resolution of the protests.
